Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3,116
Shareholders information; file documents with director.

To insure that shareholders are provided with adequate information and to prevent fraud, deception, or dissemination of misleading information, a copy of every form of proxy, consent, or authorization for use at any meeting of shareholders and a copy of every solicitation, announcement, or other communication to shareholders under circumstances reasonably calculated to result in the procurement, withholding, or revocation of a proxy, consent, or authorization shall be filed with the director by the person intending to use, issue, publish, or circulate such document.

Laws 1965, c. 249, § 2, p. 706;

Laws 1969, c. 369, § 2, p. 1311;

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 113.